el: Δυνατότητα επαναφόρτισης κάρτας: Αυτόματη online επαναφόρτιση; Μη επαναφορτιζόμενη (μίας χρήσης); Επαναφορτιζόμενη μέσω του παρόχου; Επαναφορτιζόμενη μέσω του λιανοπωλητή; Άλλο
hu: Kártya-újratölthetőség: Automatikus online feltöltés; Nem újratölthető (egyszer használatos); Szolgáltatón keresztül újratölthető; Viszonteladón keresztül újratölthető; Egyéb
zh-CN: 卡片可充值性: 自动在线充值; 不可充值（一次性使用）; 通过运营商充值; 通过零售商充值; 其他
vi: Khả năng nạp thêm tiền vào thẻ: Nạp tiền trực tuyến tự động; Không nạp lại được (dùng một lần); Có thể nạp lại qua nhà mạng; Có thể nạp lại qua cửa hàng bán lẻ; Khác
lt-LT: Kortelės papildymo galimybė: Automatinis papildymas internetu; Nepapildoma (vienkartinio naudojimo); Papildoma per operatorių; Papildoma per pardavėją; Kita
zh-TW: 卡片可否儲值: 自動線上儲值; 不可儲值 (單次使用); 可透過電信業者儲值; 可透過零售商儲值; 其他
ja: カードの再チャージ可能性: 自動オンラインチャージ; チャージ不可（使い捨て）; 通信キャリア経由でチャージ可能; 小売店経由でチャージ可能; その他
sk-SK: Dobíjateľnosť karty: Automatické online dobíjanie; Nedobíjateľná (na jedno použitie); Dobíjateľná cez operátora; Dobíjateľná u predajcu; Iné
es: Recargabilidad de la tarjeta: Recarga automática online; No recargable (de un solo uso); Recargable a través del operador; Recargable a través del minorista; Otros
th: ความสามารถในการรีชาร์จในบัตร: เติมเงินออนไลน์อัตโนมัติ; ไม่สามารถชาร์จไฟได้ (ใช้ครั้งเดียว); ชาร์จไฟได้ผ่านผู้ให้บริการ; ชาร์จไฟได้ผ่านตัวแทนจำหน่าย; อื่นๆ
en: Card rechargeability: Automatic online recharge; Non-rechargeable (single-use); Rechargeable via carrier; Rechargeable via retailer; Other
ko: 카드 충전 가능: 자동 온라인 충전; 충전 불가(일회용); 통신사를 통해 충전 가능; 소매업체를 통해 충전 가능; 기타
pt-BR: Recarga do cartão: Recarga automática online; Não recarregável (uso único); Recarregável via operadora; Recarregável via revendedor; Outro
pt-PT: Possibilidade de recarga: Carregamento automático online; Não recarregável (utilização única); Recarregável via operadora; Recarregável via revendedor; Outro
ro-RO: Reîncărcarea cardului: Reîncărcare automată online; Nereîncărcabilă (de unică folosință); Reîncărcabilă prin intermediul transportatorului; Reîncărcabilă prin intermediul comerciantului cu amănuntul; Altele
it: Possibilità di ricaricare la carta: Ricarica automatica online; Non ricaricabile (monouso); Ricaricabile dal corriere; Ricaricabile tramite rivenditore; Altro
fi: Kortin ladattavuus: Automaattinen saldolisäys; Ei-ladattava (kertakäyttöinen); Kotelolla ladattava; Jälleenmyyjällä ladattava; Muu
sl-SI: Možnost ponovnega polnjenja kartice: Samodejno spletno polnjenje; Ni mogoče polniti (enkratna uporaba); Polnjenje prek operaterja; Polnjenje prek prodajalca; Drugo
ru: Возможность пополнения карты: Автоматическое пополнение через Интернет; Без возможности пополнения (одноразовая); Пополнение через оператора связи; Пополнение через розничную сеть; Другое
sv: Kortets laddningsbarhet: Automatisk online-påfyllning; Ej uppladdningsbar (engångsbruk); Laddningsbar via leverantör; Laddningsbar via återförsäljare; Övrigt
pl: Możliwość doładowywania karty: Automatyczne doładowanie online; Brak możliwości doładowania (jednorazowego użytku); Możliwość doładowania za pośrednictwem operatora; Możliwość doładowania za pośrednictwem sprzedawcy; Inne
de: Wiederaufladbarkeit der Karte: Automatische Online-Aufladung; Nicht wiederaufladbar (Einmalgebrauch); Wiederaufladbar über den Mobilfunkanbieter; Wiederaufladbar über den Händler; Sonstiges
nl: Oplaadbaarheid van de kaart: Automatisch online opladen; Niet oplaadbaar (voor eenmalig gebruik); Oplaadbaar via provider; Oplaadbaar via retailer; Andere
tr: Kart şarj edilebilirliği: Otomatik online yükleme; Yükleme yapılamaz (tek kullanımlık); İletişim operatörü aracılığıyla yüklenebilir; Satıcı aracılığıyla yüklenebilir; Diğer
fr: Rechargeabilité de la carte: Recharge automatique en ligne; Non rechargeable (à usage unique); Rechargeable via un le transporteur; Rechargeable via le détaillant; Autre
da: Mulighed for at genopfylde kortet: Automatisk onlineopladning; Ikke-genopladelig (engangsbrug); Genopladelig via mobilselskab; Kan tankes op ho forhandleren; Andet
hr-HR: Mogućnost punjenja kartice: Automatsko mrežno punjenje; Nepunjivo (za jednokratnu upotrebu); Punjivo putem nosača; Punjivo putem trgovine; Ostalo
bg-BG: Възможност за презареждане на картата: Автоматично онлайн презареждане; Неакумулаторен (за еднократна употреба); Презарежда се чрез носител; Презарежда се от търговеца на дребно; Други
nb: Kortopplading: Automatisk påfylling på nett; Ikke-påfyllbart (engangsbruk); Påfyllbart gjennom transportør; Påfyllbart gjennom forhandler; Annet
cs: Možnost dobíjení karty: Automatické online dobíjení; Nedobíjecí (jednorázová); Dobíjení přes operátora; Dobíjení přes prodejce; Jiné